Maine, session 132, LD1376.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 28-A MRSA §2, sub-§16-A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 658, §18, is further
amended to read:
16-A. Low-alcohol spirits product. "Low-alcohol spirits product" means a product
containing spirits that has more than 1/2 of 1% of alcohol by volume but no more than 8%
15% of alcohol by volume. Beginning July 1, 2019, "low-alcohol spirits product" does not
mean a flavoring, such as an extract or concentrate, added to a malt beverage or wine that:
A. May or may not contain alcohol;
B. Is not intended to be consumed alone as a beverage or a food product but serves as
a flavor enhancement to a beverage or a food product; and
C. Is not, prior to being added to a malt beverage or wine, subject to excise tax under
chapter 65.
Sec. 2. 28-A MRSA §13, as repealed and replaced by PL 2021, c. 658, §49, is
amended to read:
§13. Low-alcohol spirits products sold by malt liquor or wine licensees
1. Retail sales. Notwithstanding any provision of this Title to the contrary, a person
licensed to sell malt liquor or wine for on-premises or off-premises consumption may also
sell low-alcohol spirits products. All provisions of this Title applicable to malt liquor or
wine, except chapters 65 and 67, apply to low-alcohol spirits products when sold by persons
licensed to sell malt liquor or wine for on-premises or off-premises consumption.
2. Wholesale sales. Notwithstanding any provision of this Title to the contrary, a
person licensed under section 1401 as an in-state wholesaler of malt liquor or wine may
also sell and distribute low-alcohol spirits products.